District of Columbia statutes.
8-704

Collection and disposal of refuse authorized as municipal function; purchase or lease of facilities; sale of products; gratuities prohibited; authorization to enter into mutual aid agreements for debris removal. [Transferred]

Recodified as § 8-741.

History

July 11, 1919, 41 Stat. 39, ch. 6, § 2
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-317, § 2, 56 DCR 209